Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2727
Official genotype test, defined.

Official genotype test means any test to determine the genotype of a live or dead animal that is conducted at an approved laboratory or at the National Veterinary Services Laboratory when the animal is officially identified and the samples used for the test are collected and shipped to the laboratory by either an accredited veterinarian or a department or APHIS representative.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 27.